hu: Világítástechnika: Világostér; Differenciál interferencia kontraszt (DIC); Sötéttér; Fluoreszcencia; Fáziskontraszt; Egyéb
cs: Technika osvětlení: Brightfield; DIC; Darkfield; Fluorescence; Fázový kontrast; Jiné
en: Illumination technique: Brightfield; DIC; Darkfield; Fluorescence; Phase contrast; Other
sk-SK: Technika osvetlenia: Svetlé pole; DIC; Tmavé pole; Fluorescencia; Fázový kontrast; Iné
pt-BR: Técnica de iluminação: Campo claro; DIC; Campo escuro; Fluorescência; Contraste de fase; Outro
pl: Technika oświetlenia: Pole jasne; DIC; Pole ciemne; Fluorescencja; Fazowo-kontrastowy; Inne
pt-PT: Técnica de iluminação: Campo claro; DIC; Campo escuro; Fluorescência; Contraste de fase; Outro
es: Técnica de iluminación: Campo claro; DIC; Campo oscuro; Fluorescencia; Contraste de fase; Otros
sl-SI: Tehnika osvetlitve: Brightfield; DIC; Darkfield; Fluorescenca; Fazni kontrast; Drugo
fi: Valaistustekniikka: Brightfield; DIC; Darkfield; Fluoresenssi; Phase contrast; Muu
de: Beleuchtungstechnik: Hellfeld; DIC; Dunkelfeld; Fluoreszenz; Phasenkontrast; Sonstiges
th: เทคนิคการส่องสว่าง: ไบรต์ฟิลด์; DIC; ดาร์กฟิลด์; ฟลูออเรสเซน; เฟสคอนทรัสต์; อื่นๆ
tr: Aydınlatma Tekniği: Parlak alan; DIC; Karanlık alan; Floresan; Faz kontrastı; Diğer
ja: 照明技術: 明視野; DIC; 暗視野; 蛍光; 位相差; その他
da: Belysningsteknik: Brightfield; DIC; Darkfield; Fluorescens; Fasekontrast; Andet
lt-LT: Apšvietimo metodas: Šviesus laukas; DIC; Tamsus laukas; Fluorescencija; Fazių kontrastas; Kita
it: Tecnica di illuminazione: Campo luminoso; DIC; Campo oscuro; Fluorescenza; Contrasto di fase; Altro
ru: Метод освещения препарата: Светлое поле; DIC; Темное поле; Флуоресценция; Фазовый контраст; Другой
bg-BG: Техника на осветяване: Светло поле; DIC; Тъмно поле; Флуоресценция; Фазов контраст; Други
ko: 조명 기술: 브라이트필드; DIC; 다크필드; 형광; 위상차; 기타
el: Τεχνική φωτισμού: Φωτεινό πεδίο; DIC; Σκοτεινό πεδίο; Φθορισμός; Αντίθεση φάσης; Άλλο
sv: Belysningsteknik: Ljusfält; DIC; Mörkfält; Fluorescens; Faskontrast; Övrigt
zh-CN: 照明技术: 明视场; DIC; 暗视场; 荧光; 相位对比; 其他
ro-RO: Tehnică de iluminare: câmp luminos; DIC; Câmp întunecat; Fluorescență; Contrast de fază; Altele
zh-TW: 照明技術: 明場; DIC; 暗場; 螢光; 相襯; 其他
vi: Kỹ thuật chiếu sáng: Trường sáng; DIC; Trường tối; Huỳnh quang; Tương phản pha; Khác
nb: Belysningsteknikk: Brightfield; DIC; Darkfield; Fluorescence; Fasekontrast; Annet
nl: Verlichtingstechniek: Helderveld; DIC; Donkerveld; Fluorescentie; Fasecontrast; Andere
hr-HR: Tehnika osvjetljivanja: Svijetlo polje; DIC; Tamno polje; Fluorescencija; Fazni kontrast; Ostalo
fr: Technique d’éclairage: Champ lumineux; DIC; Champ sombre; Fluorescence; Contraste de phase; Autre